New Jersey, session 222, A735.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The County Clerk shall cause to be made available at each polling place on the day of any election copies of applications to decline the receipt of mail-in ballots for future elections. 2.  This act shall take effect on the January 1 next following the date of enactment.